test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vashlimash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - вӓшлимӓш: # Noun 'a meeting'
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Nom: вӓшлимӓш
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Gen: вӓшлимӓшӹн
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Acc: вӓшлимӓшӹм
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Com: вӓшлимӓшге
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Dat: вӓшлимӓшлӓн
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Ine: [вӓшлимӓштӹ, вӓшлимӓшӹштӹ]
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Ill: [вӓшлимӓшӹш, вӓшлимӓшкӹ, вӓшлимӓшӹшкӹ]
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Lat: вӓшлимӓшеш
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Cmpr: вӓшлимӓшлӓ
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Abe: вӓшлимӓшде

     вӓшлимӓш+N+Pl+Nom: вӓшлимӓшвлӓ

     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC: вӓшлимӓшем
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/PC: вӓшлимӓшет
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+So/PC: вӓшлимӓшӹжӹ
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+So/PC: вӓшлимӓшнӓ
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+So/PC: вӓшлимӓшдӓ
     вӓшлимӓш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+So/PC: вӓшлимӓшӹштӹ
